Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB866.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2706(b)(1) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2706. Resident license and fee exemptions.* * *(b) Disabled veterans.--(1) Any resident disabled veteran who has a disability incurred in any war or armed conflict which consists of the loss of one or more limbs, or the loss of the use of one or more limbs, or who is 100% disabled as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, and who meets all other qualifications of this title and is otherwise mentally and physically fit, shall [be issued a free regular hunting or furtaking license], upon application to the 123456789101112131415161718 commission or a county treasurer[.], be issued any of the following licenses or permits without cost or fee under section 2709(a) (relating to license costs and fees):(i) Regular hunting.(ii) Regular furtaking.(iii) Antlerless deer.(iv) Bear.(v) Archery.(vi) Muzzleloader.(vii) Migratory game bird.(viii) Elk.(ix) Special wild turkey.(x) Pheasant, as provided under 58 Pa. Code § 147.317 (relating to permit).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0866PN0902 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516